Utah statutes.
31A-9-404.   Annual report to fraternal members.
(1)  Every domestic fraternal shall send to each member having insurance or
shall publish in the official publication under Subsection 31A-9-402 (1), an
abbreviated annual report.
(2)  This report shall contain:
(a)  basic financial and operating data;
(b)  information about important business and corporate developments;
(c)  other information the fraternal wishes to include; or
(d)  other information the commissioner by rule requires it to include to
adequately inform its members.
(3)  The fraternal shall send a business mail reply form on which the member
may request a more complete annual report. This complete annual report shall
contain the information prescribed by rule under Subsection 31A-2-201 (3).
